South Dakota, session 2026, HB1158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 13-3-55 be AMENDED:
13-3-55. Every public A school district shall annually administer the same state-
designated academic achievement assessment to all students each student in grades three
to eight, inclusive, and in grade eleven. The assessment shall measure the academic
progress of each student. Every public school district shall annually administer to all
students in at least two grade levels an achievement test to assess writing skills. The
assessment instruments shall be provided by the Department of Education, and the
department shall determine the two grade levels to be tested. The tests shall be
administered within timelines established by the Department of Education by rules
promulgated pursuant to chapter 1-26 starting in the spring of the 2002-2003 school year.
Each state-designed test shall be correlated with the state's content standards.
The secretary of the Department of Education shall annually designate at least two
of these grade levels to take the writing skills achievement assessment provided by the
department. The assessments must measure the academic progress of each student and
must correspond to the state's content standards promulgated pursuant to § 13-3-48.
A student must take any academic achievement assessment administered by a
school district if the student:
(1) Is enrolled in the school district;
(2) Is at least partially enrolled in the school district pursuant to § 13-28-41; or
(3) Receives alternative instruction pursuant to § 13-27-3 and resides in the school
district.
For purposes of this section, a student is partially enrolled in a school district if the
student is enrolled in a number of courses through the school district, the time for which,
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.449.10 2 1158
when averaged over the whole school year, equals at least fifty percent of the number of
hours in the school term, as established by the board of the school district pursuant to
§ 13-26-1.
The South Dakota Board of Education Standards may shall promulgate rules,
pursuant to chapter 1-26, to provide for administration of all the assessments and
establish the timeline for the administration of the assessments each year.
Section 2. That § 13-27-7 be AMENDED:
13-27-7. Each notification of alternative instruction pursuant to § 13-27-3 shall
be on a standard form that declares must declare that the child will be provided with
alternative instruction per § 13-27-3. The completed form notification must contain the
child's name, birthdate, resident district, and open enrolled district if applicable, signature
of the parent, guardian, or other person having control of the child and information:
(1) The full legal name, birthdate, and resident school district of the child;
(2) The school district to which the child has open enrolled, if applicable;
(3) The signature of the child's parent, guardian, or other custodian; and
(4) Information required for the return of the form. The
The notification must be on a form prescribed by the Department of Education. The
form prescribed by the department may not require more information than what is set
forth in this section.
The department or the local district shall provide the parent, guardian, or other
person having control custodian of the child with a signed or stamped copy of the
notification as proof of notification. The department or district shall keep the notification
shall be kept confidential. The form shall be provided by the secretary of the Department
of Education but may not require more details than set forth by this section.
The notification shall be filed within thirty days from the first time the child begins
an alternative instruction program while the child is of school age as defined in § 13-27-1
and is not required thereafter unless one or more of the following transitions occur:
(1) A child enrolls in a public or nonpublic school; or
(2) A child moves to a different school district.
The parent, guardian, or other person having control of the child shall provide
notification of any transitions by submitting the standard notification form to the
Department of Education or the local district within thirty days of the transition.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-27:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.449.10 3 1158
The parent, legal guardian, or other custodian of a child being provided with
alternative instruct shall file a notification of alternative instruction, pursuant to § 13-27-
7, by the following deadlines:
(1) Within thirty days of:
(a) The first time the child begins an alternative instruction program while the
child is of school age, as defined in § 13-27-1;
(b) Any change in the child's resident school district;
(c) The child being excused from compulsory school attendance, as provided in
this chapter; or
(d) The child being enrolled in a public or nonpublic school; and
(2) By September first of each school year the child is to be provided with alternative
instruction, until the child has graduated, fully enrolls in a public or nonpublic
school, or is otherwise excused from compulsory school attendance.
Section 4. That § 13-3-84 be REPEALED.
If a student is partially enrolled in a school district pursuant to § 13-28-41 or 13-
28-51, and the student's enrollment is equal to or greater than fifty percent, that student
is required to take any academic achievement test administered by the school district
pursuant to § 13-3-55. If a student's partial enrollment in a school district is less than fifty
percent, the student is not required to take any academic achievement test administered
by the school district pursuant to § 13-3-55.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.